Vermont, session 2025-2026, S133.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Municipal Zoning * * *
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 4412(15) and (16) are added to read:
(15) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no
zoning or subdivision bylaw shall have the effect of prohibiting related
occupants from constructing additional dwelling units on the same parcel.
(16) If an area of a municipality has been zoned for industrial use, but is
later changed to allow residential development, the area shall allow five or
more units per acre.
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 2 of 18
Sec. 2. 24 V.S.A. § 4303 is amended to read:
§ 4303. DEFINITIONS
The following definitions shall apply throughout this chapter unless the
context otherwise requires:
* * *
(42)(A) An area “served by municipal sewer and water infrastructure”
means an area adjacent to a road with water and sewer lines where there is
capacity or capacity is being added imminently to accommodate housing and
is:
(i) an area where residential connections and expansions are
available to municipal water and direct and indirect discharge wastewater
systems and not prohibited by:
(I) State regulations or permits;
(II) identified capacity constraints; or
(III) municipally adopted service and capacity agreements; or
(ii) an area established by the municipality by ordinance or bylaw
where residential connections and expansions are available to municipal water
and direct and indirect discharge wastewater systems and which may exclude:
(I) flood hazard or inundation areas as established by statute,
river corridors or fluvial erosion areas as established by statute, shorelands,
areas within a zoning district or overlay district the purpose of which is natural
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 3 of 18
resource protection, and wherever year-round residential development is not
allowed;
(II) areas with identified service limits established by State
regulations or permits, identified capacity constraints, or municipally adopted
service and capacity agreements;
(III) areas served by sewer and water to address an identified
community-scale public health hazard or environmental hazard;
(IV) areas serving a mobile home park that is not within an area
planned for year-round residential growth;
(V) areas serving an industrial site or park;
(VI) areas where service lines are located to serve the areas
described in subdivisions (III)–(V) of this subdivision (ii), but no connections
or expansions are permitted; or
(VII) areas that, through an approved Planned Unit
Development under section 4417 of this title or Transfer of Development
Rights under section 4423 of this title, prohibit year-round residential
development.
(B) Municipally adopted areas served by municipal sewer and water
infrastructure that limit sewer and water connections and expansions shall not
result in the unequal treatment of housing by discriminating against a year-
round residential use or housing type otherwise allowed in this chapter.
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 4 of 18
Sec. 3. REPORT; INCLUSIONARY ZONING TOOL
On or before January 15, 2026, the Commissioner of Housing and
Community Development shall report to the Senate Committee on Economic
Development, Housing and General Affairs and the House Committee on
Environment on the development of a density algorithm for calculating
inclusionary zoning unit amounts that can be used in municipalities with
inclusionary zoning.
Sec. 4. MINIMAL DESIGN STANDARDS REPORT
On or before July 1, 2026, the Commissioner of Housing and Community
Development shall report to the Senate Committee on Economic Development,
Housing and General Affairs and the House Committee on Environment on
whether the State should adopt minimal design standards for construction that
could be used to reduce municipal permit processing. The Commissioner may
review what other states, including Maine, have done.
* * * Act 250 * * *
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 6034 is amended to read:
§ 6034. TIER 1A AREA STATUS
* * *
(b) Tier 1A area status requirements.
(1) To obtain a Tier 1A area status under this section, a municipality
shall demonstrate to the Board that it has each of the following:
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 5 of 18
* * *
(I) Municipal or regional planning commission staff or other
contracted capacity adequate to support coordinated comprehensive and capital
planning, development review, and zoning administration in the Tier 1A area.
* * *
Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 6033 is amended to read:
§ 6033. REGIONAL PLAN FUTURE LAND USE MAP REVIEW
* * *
(c) To obtain a Tier 1B area status under this section the regional planning
commission shall demonstrate to the Board that the municipalities with Tier 1B
areas meet the following requirements as included in subdivision 24 V.S.A.
§ 4348a(a)(12)(C):
(1) The municipality has not requested to opt out to have the area
mapped for Tier 1B. A municipality may request to opt out of Tier 1B area
status by submitting a resolution passed by the municipality to the relevant
regional planning commission and the Board.
* * *
(6) The municipality has municipal staff, municipal officials, or regional
planning commission staff or other contracted capacity adequate to support
development review and zoning administration in the Tier 1B area.
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 6 of 18
Sec. 7. 10 V.S.A. § 8504 is amended to read:
§ 8504. APPEALS TO THE ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION
* * *
(f) Stays.
(1) The filing of an appeal shall automatically stay the act or decision in
the following situations:
(A) acts or decisions involving stream alteration permits or shoreline
encroachment permits issued by the Secretary;
(B) the denial of interested person status by a board of adjustment,
planning commission, or development review board.
(2) Upon petition by a party or upon its own motion for a stay of an act
or decision, the Environmental Division shall perform the initial review of the
request and may grant a stay. Any decision under this subsection to issue a
stay shall be subject to appeal to the Supreme Court according to the Rules of
Appellate Procedure.
(3) The filing of an appeal shall not stay an act or decision pursuant to
chapter 151 of this title and 24 V.S.A. chapter 117.
* * *
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 6081 is amended to read:
§ 6081. PERMITS REQUIRED; EXEMPTIONS
* * *
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 7 of 18
(ee) No permit or permit amendment shall be required for either:
(1) a sawmill that produces 3.5 million board feet or less annually; or
(2) an operation that involves the primary processing of forest products
of commercial value and that annually produces:
(A) 3,500 cords or less of firewood or cordwood; or
(B) 10,000 tons or less of bole wood, whole tree chips, or wood
pellets.
Sec. 9. REPEAL
10 V.S.A. § 6084(g) is repealed.
* * * Brownfields * * *
Sec. 10. 10 V.S.A. § 6604c is amended to read:
§ 6604c. MANAGEMENT OF DEVELOPMENT SOILS
(a) Management of development soils. Notwithstanding any other
requirements of this chapter to the contrary, development soils may be
managed at a location permitted pursuant to an insignificant waste event
approval authorization issued pursuant to the Solid Waste Management Rules
that contains, at a minimum, the following:
(1) the development soils are generated from a hazardous materials site
managed pursuant to a corrective action plan or a soil management plan
approved by the Secretary;
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 8 of 18
(2) the development soils have been tested for arsenic, lead, and
polyaromatic hydrocarbons pursuant to a monitoring plan approved by the
Secretary that ensures that the soils do not leach above groundwater
enforcement standards;
(3) the location where the soils are managed is appropriate for the
amount and type of material being managed;
(4) the soils are capped in a manner approved by the Secretary;
(5) any activity that may disturb the development soils at the permitted
location is done pursuant to a soil management plan approved by the Secretary;
and
(6) the permittee files a record notice of where the soils are managed in
the land records.
* * *
Sec. 11. 10 V.S.A. § 6641 is amended to read:
§ 6641. BROWNFIELD PROPERTY CLEANUP PROGRAM; CREATION;
POWERS
(a) There is created the Brownfield Property Cleanup Program to enable
certain interested parties to request the assistance of the Secretary to review
and oversee work plans for investigating, abating, removing, remediating, and
monitoring a property in exchange for protection from certain liabilities under
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 9 of 18
section 6615 of this title. The Program shall be administered by the Secretary
who shall:
* * *
(c) When conducting any review required by this subchapter, the Secretary
shall prioritize the review of remediation at a site that contains housing or that
is planned for the construction or rehabilitation of single-family or multi-
family housing.
Sec. 12. BROWNFIELDS PROCESS IMPROVEMENT; REPORT
On or before November 1, 2025, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
report to the House Committees on Environment and on General and Housing
and the Senate Committees on Economic Development, Housing and General
Affairs and on Natural Resources and Energy with proposals to make the
Program established pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 159, subchapter 3
(brownfields reuse and liability limitation) substantially more efficient. At a
minimum, the report shall include both of the following:
(1) A survey of stakeholders in the brownfields program to identify
areas that present challenges to the redevelopment of contaminated properties,
with a focus on redevelopment for housing. The Secretary shall provide
recommendations to resolve these challenges.
(2) An analysis of strengths and weaknesses of implementing a licensed
site professional program within the State. The Secretary shall make a
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 10 of 18
recommendation on whether such a program should be implemented. If the
Secretary recommends implementation, the report shall include any changes to
statute or budget needed to implement this program.
* * * Wetlands * * *
Sec. 13. 10 V.S.A. § 902 is amended to read:
§ 902. DEFINITIONS
Wherever used or referred to in this chapter, unless a different meaning
clearly appears from the context:
* * *
(7) “Class II wetland” means a wetland other than a Class I or Class III
wetland that:
(A) is a mapped wetland identified on the Vermont significant
wetlands inventory maps; or
(B) is an unmapped wetland that the Secretary determines to merit
protection, pursuant to section 914 of this title, based upon an evaluation of the
extent to which it serves the functions and values set forth in subdivision
905b(18)(A) of this title and the rules of the Department.
(8) “Class III wetland” means a wetland that is neither a Class I wetland
nor a Class II wetland.
(9) “Buffer zone” means an area contiguous to a significant wetland that
protects the wetland’s functions and values.
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 11 of 18
(A) The Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (9):
(i) the buffer zone for a Class I wetland shall extend at least 100
feet from the border of the wetland, unless the Department determines
otherwise under section 915 of this title. The; and
(ii) the buffer zone for a Class II wetland shall extend at least 50
feet from the border of the wetland unless the Secretary determines otherwise
under section 914 of this title.
(B) The buffer zone of a Class II wetland shall be 25 feet when the
wetland is located in:
(i) an industrial park, as that term is defined in subdivision 212(7)
of this title, that is permitted under chapter 151 of this title;
(ii) designated centers designated under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A;
(iii) Tier 1A and Tier 1B areas approved by the Land Use Review
Board; or
(iv) locations meeting the requirements established in subsection
6081(z) of this title as eligible for an interim exemption from the permit or
permit amendment requirements of chapter 151 of this title.
(10) “Panel” means the Water Resources Panel of the Agency of Natural
Resources.
(11) “Significant wetland” means any Class I or Class II wetland.
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 12 of 18
(12)(11) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources or the
Secretary’s authorized representative.
(13)(12) “Dam removal” has the same meaning as in section 1080 of
this title.
Sec. 14. 10 V.S.A. § 913 is amended to read:
§ 913. PROHIBITION
(a) Except for allowed uses adopted by the Department by rule, no person
shall conduct or allow to be conducted an activity in a significant wetland or
buffer zone of a significant wetland except in compliance with a permit,
conditional use determination, or order issued by the Secretary.
(b) A permit shall not be required under this section for:
(1) any activity that occurred before the effective date of this section
unless the activity occurred within:
(A) an area identified as a wetland on the Vermont significant
wetlands inventory maps;
(B) a wetland that was contiguous to an area identified as a wetland
on the Vermont significant wetlands inventory maps; or
(C) the buffer zone of a wetland referred to in subdivision (A) or (B)
of this subdivision (1);
(2) any construction within a wetland that is identified on the Vermont
significant wetlands inventory maps or within the buffer zone of such a
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 13 of 18
wetland, provided that the construction was completed prior to February 23,
1992, and no action for which a permit is required under the rules of the
Department was taken or caused to be taken on or after February 23, 1992; or
(3) any construction or activity in an unmapped Class II wetland located
in:
(A) an industrial park, as that term is defined in subdivision
212(7) of this title, that is permitted under chapter 151 of this title;
(B) designated centers designated under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A;
(C) Tier 1A and Tier 1B areas approved by the Land Use Review
Board; or
(D) locations meeting the requirements established in subsection
6081(z) of this title as eligible for an interim exemption from the permit or
permit amendment requirements of chapter 151 of this title.
Sec. 15. 10 V.S.A. § 914 is amended to read:
§ 914. WETLANDS DETERMINATIONS
(a) The Secretary may, upon a petition or on his or her the Secretary’s own
motion, determine whether any wetland is a Class II or Class III wetland. Such
The Secretary’s determinations shall be based on an evaluation of the functions
and values set forth in subdivision 905b(18)(A) of this title and the rules of the
Department.
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 14 of 18
(b) The Secretary may establish the necessary width of the buffer zone of
any Class II wetland as part of any wetland determination pursuant to the rules
of the Department, except that buffer zone of a Class II wetland shall be 25
feet when the wetland is located in:
(1) an industrial park, as that term is defined in subdivision 212(7) of
this title, that is permitted under chapter 151 of this title;
(2) designated centers designated under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A;
(3) Tier 1A and Tier 1B areas approved by the Land Use Review Board;
or
(4) locations meeting the requirements established in subsection 6081(z)
of this title as eligible for an interim exemption from the permit or permit
amendment requirements of chapter 151 of this title.
* * *
Sec. 16. 10 V.S.A. § 918 is amended to read:
§ 918. NET GAIN OF WETLANDS; STATE GOAL; RULEMAKING
(a) On or before July 1, 2025 2026, the Secretary of Natural Resources
shall amend the Vermont Wetlands Rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to
clarify that the goal of wetlands regulation and management in the State is the
net gain of wetlands to be achieved through protection of existing wetlands and
restoration of wetlands that were previously adversely affected. This condition
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 15 of 18
shall not apply to wetland, river, and flood plain restoration projects, including
dam removals.
(b)(1) The Vermont Wetlands Rules shall prioritize the protection of
existing intact wetlands from adverse effects.
(2) Where a permitted activity in a wetland will cause more than 5,000
square feet of adverse effects that cannot be avoided, the Secretary shall
mandate that the permit applicant restore, enhance, or create wetlands or
buffers to compensate for the adverse effects on a wetland. The amount of
wetlands to be restored, enhanced, or created shall be calculated, at a
minimum, by determining the acreage or square footage of wetlands
permanently drained or filled as a result of the permitted activity and
multiplying that acreage or square footage by two, to result in a ratio of 2:1
restoration to wetland loss, except that a ratio of 1:1 restoration to wetland loss
shall apply in:
(A) an industrial park, as that term is defined in subdivision 212(7) of
this title, that is permitted under chapter 151 of this title;
(B) designated centers designated under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A;
(C) Tier 1A and Tier 1B areas approved by the Land Use Review
Board; or
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 16 of 18
(D) locations meeting the requirements established in subsection
6081(z) of this title as eligible for an interim exemption from the permit or
permit amendment requirements of chapter 151 of this title.
(3) Establishment of a buffer zone contiguous to a wetland shall not
substitute for the restoration, enhancement, or creation of wetlands. Adverse
impacts to wetland buffers shall be compensated for based on the effects of the
impact on wetland function.
* * *
Sec. 17. 10 V.S.A. § 919 is amended to read:
§ 919. WETLANDS PROGRAM REPORTS
(a) On or before April 30, 2025, and annually thereafter, the Secretary of
Natural Resources shall submit to the House Committee on Environment and
Energy and to the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy a report
on annual losses and gains of significant wetlands in the State. The report shall
include:
(1) the location and acreage of Class II wetland and buffer losses
permitted by the Agency in accordance with section 913 of this title, for which
construction of the permitted project has commenced;
(2) the acreage of Class II wetlands and buffers gained through permit-
related enhancement and restoration, and an estimate of wetlands gained
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 17 of 18
through wetlands, river, and floodplain restoration projects, including dam
removals;
(3) the number of site visits and technical assistance calls conducted by
the Agency of Natural Resources, the number of permits processed by the
Agency, and any enforcement actions that were taken by the Agency or the
Office of the Attorney General in the previous year for violations of this
chapter; and
(4) an updated mitigation summary of the extent of wetlands restored
on-site compared with compensation performed off-site, in-lieu fees paid, or
conservation.
* * *
(c) On or before December 15, 2025, the Agency of Natural Resources
shall publish on its website and submit to the House Committee on
Environment and to the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy
wetland guidance on the mitigation and compensation sequence contemplated
in the Vermont Wetland Rules subsections 9.5(b) and (c). The guidance shall
clearly identify the process applicants should follow and the information and
proof necessary to demonstrate a project has practicably avoided and
minimized wetland impacts and is eligible for mitigation during the State
wetland permit application process.
VT LEG #381348 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.133
2025 Page 18 of 18
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 18. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381348 v.4